Illinois, session 104th, SB1480.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by adding Section 6.17 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/6.17 new)7    Sec. 6.17. Behavioral health services; required crisis 8coverage. The program of health benefits is subject to the 9provisions of Section 370c.3 of the Illinois Insurance Code 10requiring coverage of crisis services as defined in 89 Ill. 11Adm. Code 140.453(d)(3). 12    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 13adding Section 10-4-2.9 as follows: 14    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.9 new)15    Sec. 10-4-2.9. Behavioral health services; required crisis 16coverage. The corporate authorities of all municipalities are 17subject to the provisions of Section 370c.3 of the Illinois 18Insurance Code requiring coverage of crisis services as 19defined in 89 Ill. Adm. Code 140.453(d)(3). 20    Section 15. The School Code is amended by adding Section   SB1480- 2 -LRB104 06841 KTG 16877 b110-22.3g as follows: 2    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3g new)3    Sec. 10-22.3g. Behavioral health services; no utilization 4or prior approval mandates. Insurance protection and benefits 5for employees shall be subject to the provisions of Section 6370c.3 of the Illinois Insurance Code requiring coverage of 7crisis services as defined in 89 Ill. Adm. Code 140.453(d)(3). 8    Section 20. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 9adding Section 370c.3 as follows: 10    (215 ILCS 5/370c.3 new)11    Sec. 370c.3. Mandatory coverage for crisis services.12    (a) All group and individual health insurance policies 13issued, delivered, amended, or renewed in Illinois that 14provide coverage for medical or surgical conditions shall also 15provide coverage for crisis services, regardless of any 16difference in billing codes used for such services.17    (b) Coverage for crisis services may not be denied or 18restricted based on the modality or setting of the services. 19Crisis services shall be covered whether delivered in person, 20through telehealth, or in a residential or outpatient setting, 21to the extent that such services are covered in other settings 22or modalities under the policy.23    (c) For the purposes of this Section, "crisis services"   SB1480- 3 -LRB104 06841 KTG 16877 b1refers to any and all services defined under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 2140.453(d)(3), including, but not limited to, the following:3        (i) Crisis Intervention. 4        (ii) Mobile Crisis Response. 5        (iii) Crisis Stabilization.  6    Section 25. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 7amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 8    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)9    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 10    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 11the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 12141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 13152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 14155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g, 15356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 16356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 17356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 18356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 19356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 20356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 21356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 22356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 23356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 24356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68,   SB1480- 4 -LRB104 06841 KTG 16877 b1356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 2356z.77, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 3368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 370c.3, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 4403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) of 5subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 6XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 7Illinois Insurance Code.8    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 9for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 10Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 11are deemed to be "domestic companies":12        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 13    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;14        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 15    State; or16        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 17    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 18    of this State, except a corporation subject to 19    substantially the same requirements in its state of 20    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 21    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.22    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 23acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 24pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,25        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 26    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the   SB1480- 5 -LRB104 06841 KTG 16877 b1    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 2    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 3    acquisition of control takes effect;4        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 5    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 6    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 7    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 8    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 9    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 10    other acquisition of control;11        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 12    following information:13            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 14        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 15        Organization sought to be acquired;16            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 17        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 18        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 19        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 20        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 21        forma financial statements reflecting projected 22        combined operation for a period of 2 years;23            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 24        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 25        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 26        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and  SB1480- 6 -LRB104 06841 KTG 16877 b1            (D) such other information as the Director shall 2        require.3    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 4Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 5any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 6enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 7maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 8to its health care certificates).9    (e) In considering any management contract or service 10agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 11Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 12specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 13take into account the effect of the management contract or 14service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 15and the financial condition of the health maintenance 16organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 17into account the effect of the management contract or service 18agreement on competition.19    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 20Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 21Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 22defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 23Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 24group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 25additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:26        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with   SB1480- 7 -LRB104 06841 KTG 16877 b1    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 2    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 3    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 4    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 5    not be less than one year); and6        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 7    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 8    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 9    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 10    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 11    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 12    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 13    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 14    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 15    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 16    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 17    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 18    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 19    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 20    plan years.21    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 22statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 23describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 24and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 25the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 26to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's   SB1480- 8 -LRB104 06841 KTG 16877 b1profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 2unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 3or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 4experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 5the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 6enrollment unit.7    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 8Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 9contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 10refund authorized under this Section.11    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 12if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 13accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 14Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 15Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 16adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 17(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 18102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 191-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 20eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 21102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 221-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 23eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 24103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 256-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 26eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24;   SB1480- 9 -LRB104 06841 KTG 16877 b1103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 21-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 3eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 4103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 51-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 611-26-24.) 7    Section 30. The Telehealth Act is amended by adding 8Section 20 as follows: 9    (225 ILCS 150/20 new)10    Sec. 20. Behavioral health crisis services delivered via 11telehealth.12    (a) Notwithstanding any existing regulation, to the 13fullest extent permitted by federal law, all crisis services 14listed under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 140.453(d)(3) of the Illinois 15Administrative Code shall be permitted to be delivered via 16telehealth where practical. This authorization shall apply to, 17at minimum, Crisis Intervention, Mobile Crisis Response (both 18Individual and Team), Crisis Stabilization, and Community 19Stabilization. The Department may elect to establish 20differential rates for telehealth services. The Department 21shall have rulemaking authority to implement this Section. 22    (b) To ensure services may be provided without 23administrative delay, no prior authorization or utilization 24management control requirement shall be placed on any crisis   SB1480- 10 -LRB104 06841 KTG 16877 b1service delivered via telehealth under this Section.  2    Section 35. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 3adding Section 5-65 as follows: 4    (305 ILCS 5/5-65 new)5    Sec. 5-65. Reimbursement for crisis services.6    (a) For the purposes of this Section, "crisis services" 7refers to any and all services defined under 89 Ill. Admin Code 8140.453(d)(3), including, but not limited to, the following:9        (1) Behavioral Health Hotline Services.10        (2) Crisis Intervention.11        (3) Mobile Crisis Response.12        (4) Crisis Stabilization.13        (5) 23-Hour Crisis Observation.14        (6) Community Stabilization.15        (7) Crisis Residential.16        (8) Crisis Respite.17    (b) Subject to federal approval and notwithstanding any 18other provision of this Code, for dates of service beginning 19on and after July 1, 2026, crisis services shall be covered and 20reimbursed under the medical assistance program for persons 21who are otherwise eligible for medical assistance under this 22Article.23    (c) All crisis services listed under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 24140.453(d)(3) of the Illinois Administrative Code shall be   SB1480- 11 -LRB104 06841 KTG 16877 b1considered emergency services and shall not be subject to 2prior authorization or other utilization management controls. 3    (d) The Department shall, no later than July 1, 2026, 4ensure that all State-funded crisis services, including mobile 5crisis and crisis stabilization services, include 6reimbursement for services provided by Certified Recovery 7Support Specialists and other similar behavioral health 8professionals. 9    (e) The Department shall apply for any federal waiver or 10Title XIX State Plan amendment, if required, to implement this 11Section. The Department may adopt any rules, including 12standards and criteria, necessary to implement this Section.  13    Section 40. The Strengthening and Transforming Behavioral 14Health Crisis Care in Illinois Act is amended by changing 15Section 1 and by adding Section 35 as follows: 16    (405 ILCS 160/1)17    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Crisis 18Continuum Sustainability Strengthening and Transforming 19Behavioral Health Crisis Care in Illinois Act.20(Source: P.A. 103-337, eff. 7-28-23.) 21    (405 ILCS 160/35 new)22    Sec. 35. Statewide Crisis Continuum Strategic Plan. On or 23before December 31, 2028, and every 5 years thereafter, the   SB1480- 12 -LRB104 06841 KTG 16877 b1Department shall, subject to available funding and in 2collaboration with relevant stakeholders and state bodies, 3develop and submit a Statewide Crisis Continuum Strategic Plan 4to the Office of the Governor and the General Assembly, with 5the goal of ensuring every Illinoisan has timely access to 6appropriate and supportive behavioral health response during a 7behavioral health crisis. The strategic plan shall:8        (1) identify statewide goals, key stakeholders, and 9    performance metrics for expanding access to behavioral 10    health crisis continuum services across Illinois;11        (2) address gaps in service delivery, including 12    geographic disparities in crisis intervention and access 13    to services, and provide recommendations for addressing 14    these gaps;15        (3) present strategies for improving data collection, 16    reporting, and analysis to better understand social and 17    demographic factors contributing to suicide and crisis 18    events in Illinois; and19        (4) outline a sustainable funding framework to 20    maintain and expand the 9-8-8 hotline and Illinois's 21    crisis intervention infrastructure, including making 22    recommendations for legislative or regulatory changes to 23    streamline funding and reduce administrative burdens on 24    providers and residents in need of services.